Maryland, session 2026, HB1574.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
1–101.
(a) In this article, unless the context requires otherwise, the following words have
the meanings indicated.
(f) “Department” means the State Department of Education.
9.5–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Advertisement” means a communication that is intended to influence a
person to enter into an obligation or sign a contract for services.
(c) “Child care center” has the meaning stated in § 9.5–401 of this title.
(d) “Family child care home” has the meaning stated in § 9.5–301 of this title.

HOUSE BILL 1574 3
(e) “Large family child care home” has the meaning stated in § 9.5–301 of this
title.
(f) “License” means a license issued by the Department to operate a child care
center.
(g) “Registration” means a registration issued by the Department to a family child
care home or a large family child care home.
9.5–106.
(A) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 9.5–107 of this subtitle AND EXCEPT AS
PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION:
(1) If a licensee violates any provision of this title or of a rule or regulation
adopted under this title, the Department may suspend the license for a period not exceeding
1 year; and
(2) If a licensee or registrant violates any provision of this title or of a rule
or regulation adopted under this title, the Department may revoke the license or
registration.
(B) IF A LICENSEE OR REGISTRANT VIOLATES A RULE OR REGULATION
ADOPTED UNDER THIS TITLE WITHIN THE FIRST YEAR OF ADOPTION BY THE
DEPARTMENT:
(1) FOR THE FIRST VIOLATION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL WARN THE
LICENSEE OR REGISTRANT AND DISCUSS THE TERMS OF THE NEW RULE OR
REGULATION; AND
(2) FOR SUBSEQUENT VIOLATIONS, THE DEPARTMENT MAY IMPOSE
ON THE LICENSEE OR REGISTRANT A PENALTY AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS TITLE
(1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES ONLY TO REGULATIONS ADOPTED ON
OR AFTER JULY 1, 2026, THAT ADD NEW REGULATIONS OR SUBSTANTIVELY AMEND
EXISTING REGULATIONS.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH A GRACE PERIOD FOR THE
IMPLEMENTATION OF NEW OR AMENDED REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER THIS
TITLE.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT HAS DISCRETION TO DETERMINE WHEN A
GRACE PERIOD MAY OR MAY NOT BE PROVIDED, INCLUDING WHEN:

HOUSE BILL 1574
(I) A REGULATION IS NECESSARY TO PROTECT THE HEALTH OR
SAFETY OF CHILDREN; OR
(II) A REGULATION IS NECESSARY TO ENSURE COMPLIANCE
WITH FEDERAL LAW.
9.5–107.
The Department may not suspend or revoke a license or registration unless the
Department gives to the licensee or registrant:
(1) Notice of the suspension or revocation at least 20 days before the
suspension or revocation;
(2) A statement of the grounds for the suspension or revocation; and
(3) An opportunity to be heard.
9.5–118.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) (I) “APPLICANT” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS APPLYING FOR
A POSITION INVOLVING DIRECT CONTACT WITH CHILDREN IN A LICENSED CHILD
CARE CENTER, REGISTERED FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME, OR REGISTERED LARGE
FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME.
(II) “APPLICANT” INCLUDES A VOLUNTEER OR AN ADDITIONAL
ADULT WHO ASSISTS A CHILD CARE PROVIDER IN CARING FOR CHILDREN IN A
FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME OR A LARGE FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME.
(3) “CENTRAL REPOSITORY” MEANS THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE
INFORMATION SYSTEM CENTRAL REPOSITORY OF THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC
SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL SERVICES.
(B) AN APPLICANT TO A FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME, A LARGE FAMILY CHILD
CARE HOME, OR A CHILD CARE CENTER SHALL SUBMIT TO A CRIMINAL HISTORY
RECORDS CHECK IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 5–555 OF THE FAMILY LAW ARTICLE.
(C) (1) (I) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH A UNIT WITHIN THE
DEPARTMENT FOR THE DEDICATED PURPOSE OF PROCESSING AND MANAGING
INFORMATION ABOUT CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECKS FOR APPLICANTS TO
PROVIDE CHILD CARE SERVICES.

HOUSE BILL 1574 5
(II) THE UNIT MAY BE STAFFED BY EXISTING EMPLOYEES IN
THE REGIONAL CHILD CARE LICENSING OFFICES THROUGHOUT THE STATE.
(2) (I) WITHIN 10 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING AN APPLICATION FOR A
CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK, THE UNIT SHALL ACKNOWLEDGE RECEIPT
AND NOTIFY THE INDIVIDUAL REGARDING THE STATUS OF THE APPLICATION.
(II) SUBJECT TO RECEIPT OF CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS
INFORMATION FROM THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY, WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER
RECEIVING AN APPLICATION FOR A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK, THE UNIT
SHALL NOTIFY THE INDIVIDUAL REGARDING THE INDIVIDUAL’S ELIGIBILITY TO
PROVIDE CHILD CARE SERVICES IN A LICENSED OR REGISTERED CHILD CARE
PROGRAM.
(D) (1) A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK OF AN INDIVIDUAL
APPROVED TO PROVIDE CHILD CARE SERVICES SHALL REMAIN VALID FOR 5 YEARS.
(2) (I) THE UNIT SHALL MAINTAIN A LIST OF INDIVIDUALS WHO
HAVE SUBMITTED CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECKS IN ACCORDANCE WITH
THIS SECTION.
(II) THE UNIT MAY SHARE THE NAME AND STATUS OF AN
INDIVIDUAL ON THE LIST WITH:
1. A LICENSED CHILD CARE CENTER, REGISTERED
FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME, OR REGISTERED LARGE FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME AT
WHICH THE INDIVIDUAL SEEKS TO VOLUNTEER OR BE EMPLOYED; AND
2. THE INDIVIDUAL.
(3) THE UNIT SHALL, ON REQUEST BY AN INDIVIDUAL OR CHILD CARE
PROVIDER, PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE TO A LICENSED CHILD CARE CENTER,
REGISTERED FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME, OR REGISTERED LARGE FAMILY CHILD
CARE HOME THAT AN INDIVIDUAL WHO SEEKS TO BE EMPLOYED BY OR VOLUNTEER
WITH THE CHILD CARE PROVIDER HAS A VALID CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK
ON FILE WITH THE DEPARTMENT.
(E) (1) INFORMATION OBTAINED FROM THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION:
(I) IS CONFIDENTIAL;
(II) MAY NOT BE REDISSEMINATED; AND

HOUSE BILL 1574
(III) MAY BE USED ONLY FOR THE PURPOSES STATED IN THIS
SECTION.
(2) THE SUBJECT OF A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK UNDER
THIS SECTION MAY CONTEST THE CONTENTS OF THE CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS
CHECK ISSUED BY THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY AS PROVIDED IN § 10–223 OF THE
CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE.
9.5–303.
(a) The State Board shall adopt regulations that relate to the registration of
family child care homes and large family child care homes.
(b) So far as practicable, the regulations shall be uniform with the rules and
regulations adopted by other State agencies as those rules and regulations relate to other
types of child care.
(c) At a minimum, the regulations shall provide for:
(1) Minimum standards of environmental health and safety, including
provisions for:
(i) Adequate and safe physical surroundings, including
requirements for window coverings in accordance with § 5–505 of the Family Law Article;
(ii) The physical and mental health of child care providers; [and]
(iii) Investigation of any criminal record of a child care provider; AND
(IV) MAINTAINING EMERGENCY INFORMATION FROM A CHILD’S
PARENT OR GUARDIAN THAT IS UPDATED AS NEEDED AND REVIEWED BY THE
PARENT OR GUARDIAN AT LEAST ONCE EACH YEAR;
(2) A thorough evaluation of each prospective family child care home, large
family child care home, and child care provider, to be completed before the Department
accepts an initial registration;
(3) An initial family child care registration that expires 2 years after its
effective date;
(4) A continuing family child care registration that:
(i) Upon application by the child care provider that meets the
requirements set by the Department, is issued to the provider before the end of the initial
registration period; and

HOUSE BILL 1574 7
(ii) Once issued, remains in effect until surrendered, suspended,
revoked, or replaced by a conditional registration;
(5) Reporting of any changed circumstances that relate to the
requirements, by the child care provider, at the time the change occurs;
(6) An orientation to be provided to prospective child care providers by the
Department before initial registration;
(7) Announced inspection by the Department of each registered family
child care home and large family child care home prior to issuance of an initial or continuing
registration to determine whether applicable requirements are being met;
(8) Unannounced inspection by the Department of each registered family
child care home and large family child care home at least once during each 12–month period
that an initial or continuing registration is in effect to determine whether safe and
appropriate child care is being provided;
(9) Procedures to be followed by the Department in response to a complaint
about a family child care home or large family child care home THAT:
(I) MAKE USE OF A UNIFORM COMPLAINT INTAKE PROCESS;
AND
(II) IMPLEMENT ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, IMPLEMENT A
STANDARDIZED COMPLAINT PRIORITY GUIDE THAT DIFFERENTIATES COMPLAINTS
BY THE SERIOUSNESS OF THE ISSUE RAISED, INCLUDING DEFINED RESPONSE TIMES
FOR EACH LEVEL OF COMPLAINT;
(10) A requirement that each registered child care provider shall hold a
current certificate indicating successful completion of approved:
(i) Basic first aid training through the American Red Cross or
through a program with equivalent standards; and
(ii) Cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR) training through the
American Heart Association or through a program with equivalent standards appropriate
for the ages of children for whom care is provided in the family child care home or large
family child care home;
(11) A requirement that the minimum age of a family child care teacher in
a registered large family child care home be at least 18 years old and that an individual not
be precluded from being a family child care teacher solely for being 18 years old;

HOUSE BILL 1574
(12) (i) A requirement that a family child care home or large family child
care home that receives notice of a contaminated drinking water supply from the family
child care home’s or large family child care home’s supplier of water, in accordance with §
9–410 of the Environment Article or otherwise, send notice of the drinking water
contamination to the parent or legal guardian of each child attending the family child care
home or large family child care home; and
(ii) A requirement that the notice sent by the family child care home
or large family child care home shall:
1. Be sent within 10 business days after receipt of the notice
of contamination from the family child care home’s or large family child care home’s water
supplier;
2. Be in writing;
3. Identify the contaminants and their levels in the family
child care home’s or large family child care home’s water supply; and
4. Describe the family child care home’s or large family child
care home’s plan for dealing with the water contamination problem until the family child
care home’s or large family child care home’s water is determined by the appropriate
authority to be safe for consumption; and
(13) A requirement that a family child care home or large family child care
home prohibit the administration of corporal punishment to discipline a child.
(d) The State Board shall adopt regulations that:
(1) Require a family child care provider to have a written emergency
preparedness plan for emergency situations that require evacuation, sheltering in place, or
other protection of children such as in the event of fire, natural disaster, or other
threatening situation that may pose a health or safety hazard to the children in the family
child care home or large family child care home;
(2) Require the plan under item (1) of this subsection to include:
(i) A designated relocation site and evacuation route;
(ii) Procedures for notifying parents or other adults responsible for
the child of the relocation;
(iii) Procedures to address the needs of individual children including
children with special needs;
(iv) Procedures for the reassignment of staff duties during an
emergency, as appropriate; and

HOUSE BILL 1574 9
(v) Procedures for communicating with local emergency
management officials or other appropriate State or local authorities; and
(3) Require a family child care provider to train staff and ensure that staff
are familiar with the plan.
9.5–306.
(a) A registration under this subtitle may be revoked, a child care provider may
appeal from the revocation, and the operation of an unregistered family child care home
may be enjoined.
(b) (1) Revocation, appeal, or injunction under this subtitle shall be in
accordance with Subtitle 1 of this title AND SUBJECT TO § 9.5–306.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) Subject to paragraph (1) of this subsection, the State Superintendent or
the State Superintendent’s designee shall exercise the authority granted to the
Department.
9.5–306.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “MARYLAND EXCELS” MEANS THE TIERED QUALITY RATING AND
IMPROVEMENT SYSTEM FOR EARLY CARE AND EDUCATION PROGRAMS
ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(3) “PUBLISHED” MEANS A MARYLAND EXCELS STATUS
INDICATING THAT THE EARLY CARE AND EDUCATION PROGRAM HAS:
(I) MET THE MARYLAND EXCELS REQUIREMENTS FOR A
SPECIFIED QUALITY RATING; AND
(II) A QUALITY RATING PUBLISHED ON THE MARYLAND
EXCELS PUBLIC PORTAL FOR PUBLIC VIEWING.
(4) “QUALITY RATING” MEANS A DETERMINATION, REPRESENTED BY
A NUMBER FROM 1 THROUGH 5, THAT A PARTICIPATING PROGRAM HAS MET THE
CRITERIA APPLICABLE TO A PARTICULAR SET OF MARYLAND EXCELS STANDARDS.
(B) IF THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES THAT A FAMILY CHILD CARE
PROVIDER WITH A PUBLISHED MARYLAND EXCELS QUALITY RATING HAS
VIOLATED A REQUIREMENT OF THIS TITLE OR A RULE OR REGULATION ADOPTED

HOUSE BILL 1574
UNDER THIS TITLE, THE DEPARTMENT IMMEDIATELY SHALL NOTIFY THE FAMILY
CHILD CARE PROVIDER OF THE VIOLATION.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT AND THE FAMILY CHILD CARE PROVIDER SHALL
ENTER INTO AN AGREEMENT THAT DESCRIBES:
(1) THE NATURE OF THE VIOLATION;
(2) THE ACTIONS TO BE TAKEN BY THE FAMILY CHILD CARE
PROVIDER TO BECOME COMPLIANT; AND
(3) A PLAN FOR FOLLOW–UP BY THE DEPARTMENT TO ENSURE THAT
THE FAMILY CHILD CARE PROVIDER HAS RETURNED TO AND REMAINS FULLY
COMPLIANT WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS TITLE OR A RULE OR REGULATION
THAT WAS PREVIOUSLY VIOLATED.
(D) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
THE DEPARTMENT MAY REDUCE OR RESCIND A PUBLISHED MARYLAND EXCELS
QUALITY RATING IF THE FAMILY CHILD CARE PROVIDER:
(I) FAILS TO COMPLY WITH THE TERMS OF THE AGREEMENT OR
OTHERWISE FAILS TO CURE THE INITIAL VIOLATION; OR
(II) FAILS OR REFUSES TO ENTER INTO AN AGREEMENT.
(2) IF THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES THAT THE VIOLATION DID NOT
INVOLVE AN IMMEDIATE RISK TO CHILD SAFETY AND THE FAMILY CHILD CARE
PROVIDER TIMELY RETURNED TO COMPLIANCE, THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT
REDUCE THE PUBLISHED MARYLAND EXCELS QUALITY RATING OF THE FAMILY
CHILD CARE PROVIDER.
(E) IF THE DEPARTMENT REDUCED THE PUBLISHED MARYLAND EXCELS
QUALITY RATING OF A FAMILY CHILD CARE PROVIDER, WITHIN 30 DAYS OF THE
PROVIDER RETURNING TO COMPLIANCE BY FULFILLING THE TERMS OF THE
AGREEMENT REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL RESTORE THE PUBLISHED MARYLAND EXCELS QUALITY
RATING OF THE FAMILY CHILD CARE PROVIDER TO THE QUALITY RATING EARNED
BEFORE THE VIOLATION OCCURRED.
9.5–404.
(a) The State Board shall adopt rules and regulations for licensing and operating
child care centers.

HOUSE BILL 1574 11
(b) These rules and regulations shall:
(1) Ensure safe and sanitary conditions in child care centers;
(2) Ensure proper care, protection, and supervision of children in child care
centers, INCLUDING ESTABLISHING PROCEDURES TO BE FOLLOWED BY THE
DEPARTMENT IN RESPONSE TO A COMPLAINT ABOUT A CHILD CARE CENTER THAT:
(I) MAKE USE OF A UNIFORM COMPLAINT INTAKE PROCESS;
AND
(II) IMPLEMENT A STANDARDIZED COMPLAINT PRIORITY GUIDE
THAT DIFFERENTIATES COMPLAINTS BY THE SERIOUSNESS OF THE ISSUE RAISED,
INCLUDING DEFINED RESPONSE TIMES FOR EACH LEVEL OF COMPLAINT;
(3) Ensure the health of children in child care centers by:
(i) Monitoring children for signs and symptoms of child abuse;
(ii) Instructing licensees and staff concerning child abuse detection
and reporting;
(III) REQUIRING THE MAINTENANCE OF EMERGENCY
INFORMATION FROM A CHILD’S PARENT OR GUARDIAN THAT IS UPDATED AS NEEDED
AND REVIEWED BY THE PARENT OR GUARDIAN AT LEAST ONCE EACH YEAR;
[(iii)] (IV) Monitoring health practices to help prevent the spread of
disease;
[(iv)] (V) Monitoring the care of infants and children with special
needs; and
[(v)] (VI) Prohibiting the administration of corporal punishment to
discipline a child;
(4) Promote the sound growth and development of children in child care
centers;
(5) Promote proper nutrition and developmentally appropriate practices
by:
(i) Establishing training and policies promoting breast–feeding;
(ii) 1. Requiring compliance with the United States Department
of Agriculture Child and Adult Care Food Program standards for beverages served to

HOUSE BILL 1574
children, except that milk that is not nonfat or low fat may be ordered by a health care
practitioner or requested by a parent or guardian; and
2. Prohibiting beverages other than infant formula that
contain added sweetener or caffeine; and
(iii) Setting limits on screen time;
(6) Carry out otherwise the purposes and requirements of this subtitle,
including, WHEN NECESSARY, BY ENFORCEMENT THROUGH:
(I) THE imposition of intermediate sanctions to ensure compliance;
(II) ALTERATIONS IN THE MARYLAND EXCELS QUALITY
RATING IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 9.5–411.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(III) INDIVIDUALIZED PENALTIES IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
9.5–411.2 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(7) Prohibit a child from remaining at a child care center for more than 14
hours in 1 day unless the Department issues an exception for that child based on guidelines
set by the State Superintendent;
(8) (i) Require that a child care center have in attendance at all times
at least 1 individual who is responsible for supervision of children, including children on
field trips, and who holds a current certificate indicating successful completion of approved:
1. Basic first aid training through the American Red Cross
or through a program with equivalent standards; and
2. Cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR) training through
the American Heart Association or through a program with equivalent standards
appropriate for the ages of children for whom care is provided in the child care center; and
(ii) Require that a child care center serving more than 20 children
have in attendance certificate holders described in item (i) of this item in a ratio of
certificate holders to children set by the Department;
(9) Require that [the minimum age of a child care teacher in a child care
center be] A CHILD CARE TEACHER IN A CHILD CARE CENTER:
(I) BE at least 18 years old and [an individual] may not be
precluded from being a child care teacher solely for being 18 years old; AND

HOUSE BILL 1574 13
(II) COMPLETE BEGINNING JULY 1, 2027, COMPLETE ACTIVE
SUPERVISION TRAINING WITHIN 90 DAYS AFTER BEING HIRED AS A CHILD CARE
TEACHER; AND
(III) MEET EXPERIENTIAL AND EDUCATIONAL REQUIREMENTS
THAT REQUIRE NOT MORE THAN 6 MONTHS OR 750 HOURS OF WORK WITH YOUNG
CHILDREN IN A SUPERVISORY SETTING;
(10) (i) Require that a child care center that receives notice of a
contaminated drinking water supply from the child care center’s supplier of water, in
accordance with § 9–410 of the Environment Article or otherwise, send notice of the
drinking water contamination to the parent or legal guardian of each child attending the
child care center; and
(ii) Require that the notice sent by the child care center shall:
1. Be sent within 10 business days after receipt of the notice
of contamination from the child care center’s water supplier;
2. Be in writing;
3. Identify the contaminants and their levels in the center’s
water supply; and
4. Describe the child care center’s plan for dealing with the
water contamination problem until the child care center’s water is determined by the
appropriate authority to be safe for consumption;
(11) (i) Require a child care center to have a written emergency
preparedness plan for emergency situations that require evacuation, sheltering in place, or
other protection of children, such as in the event of fire, natural disaster, or other
threatening situation that may pose a health or safety hazard to the children in the child
care center;
(ii) Require the plan under item (i) of this item to include:
1. A designated relocation site and evacuation route;
2. Procedures for notifying parents or other adults
responsible for the child of the relocation;
3. Procedures to address the needs of individual children,
including children with special needs;
4. Procedures for the reassignment of staff duties during an
emergency, as appropriate; and

HOUSE BILL 1574
5. Procedures for communicating with local emergency
management officials or other appropriate State or local authorities; and
(iii) Require a child care center to train staff and ensure that staff are
familiar with the plan;
(12) Require a child care center to have window coverings in accordance with
§ 5–505 of the Family Law Article; and
(13) Subject to subsection (c) of this section, establish probationary
employment qualifications for an individual who is applying for the first time to be a child
care teacher in a child care center in the State that serves preschool or school–age children
who are at least 3 years old.
(c) (1) The probationary employment qualifications established under
subsection (b)(13) of this section shall allow an individual to be employed as a child care
teacher during a probationary period if the individual:
(i) 1. Is enrolled in approved pre–service training;
2. Successfully completes the required 90 hours of the
approved pre–service training within 6 months after being hired; and
3. Holds an associate degree or a bachelor’s degree in:
A. Early childhood education;
B. Elementary education;
C. Child development;
D. Home economics;
E. Nursing;
F. Social work;
G. Special education; or
H. A related field approved by the Department; or
(ii) 1. Is enrolled in approved pre–service training;
2. Has successfully completed at least 45 hours of the
approved pre–service training at the time the child care center hires the individual;

HOUSE BILL 1574 15
3. Successfully completes the remaining hours of the
pre–service training within 6 months after being hired; and
4. Holds an associate degree or a bachelor’s degree in a field
other than a field listed under item (i)3 of this paragraph.
(2) If, at the end of the 6–month probationary period, an individual
described in paragraph (1) of this subsection has not completed the required pre–service
training, the child care center shall, with no further cause, terminate the individual or
reassign the individual to a nonteaching position.
9.5–411.
(a) Subject to the hearing requirements of this section, the Department may deny
a license or letter of compliance to any applicant or deny approval for a change under §
9.5–408 of this subtitle if the applicant or proposed change does not meet the requirements
of this subtitle.
(b) (1) Subject to the hearing requirements of this section and § 9.5–415 of this
subtitle AND EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, the State
Superintendent may suspend or revoke a license or letter of compliance if the licensee:
[(1)] (I) Violates a provision of this subtitle or any rule or regulation
adopted under it; or
[(2)] (II) Does not meet the current requirements for a new license or
letter of compliance.
(2) IF A LICENSEE OR LETTER HOLDER VIOLATES A RULE OR
REGULATION ADOPTED UNDER THIS TITLE WITHIN THE FIRST YEAR OF ADOPTION
BY THE DEPARTMENT:
(I) FOR THE FIRST VIOLATION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
WARN THE LICENSEE OR LETTER HOLDER AND DISCUSS THE TERMS OF THE NEW
RULE OR REGULATION; AND
(II) FOR SUBSEQUENT VIOLATIONS, THE DEPARTMENT MAY
IMPOSE ON THE LICENSEE OR LETTER HOLDER A PENALTY AUTHORIZED UNDER
THIS TITLE.
(c) (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) of this section, before
any action is taken under this section, the State Superintendent shall give the individual
against whom the action is contemplated an opportunity for a public hearing before the
State Superintendent.

HOUSE BILL 1574
(2) The hearing notice to be given to the individual shall be sent at least 10
days before the hearing.
(3) The individual may be represented at the hearing by counsel.
(d) (1) (i) The State Superintendent may suspend the license or letter of
compliance to operate a child care center on an emergency basis when the State
Superintendent determines that this action is required to protect the health, safety, or
welfare of a child in the child care center.
(ii) When the State Superintendent suspends a license or letter of
compliance on an emergency basis, the State Superintendent shall deliver written notice of
the suspension to the licensee stating the regulatory basis for the suspension.
(2) (i) Upon delivery of the emergency suspension notice, the licensee
or letter holder shall cease immediately operation of the child care center.
(ii) The licensee or letter holder may request a hearing before the
State Superintendent.
(3) (i) If a hearing is requested by the licensee or letter holder, the State
Superintendent shall hold a hearing within 7 calendar days of the request for a hearing.
The hearing shall be held in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.
(ii) Within 7 calendar days of the hearing a decision concerning the
emergency suspension shall be made by the State Superintendent.
(4) If the emergency suspension order is upheld by the State
Superintendent, the licensee or letter holder shall continue to cease operations until it is
determined that the health, safety, or welfare of a child in the child care center is no longer
threatened.
(5) Any person aggrieved by a decision of the State Superintendent to
uphold an emergency suspension may appeal that decision directly to the circuit court in
the county in which the child care center is located.
(e) The State Superintendent may petition the circuit court in the county in which
the child care center is located to enjoin the activities and operations of a person who
operates a child care center without a license or letter of compliance as required by this
subtitle, including when a license or letter of compliance has been denied, revoked, or
suspended in accordance with this subtitle.
9.5–411.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.

HOUSE BILL 1574 17
(2) “MARYLAND EXCELS” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9.5–306.1
OF THIS TITLE.
(3) “PUBLISHED” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9.5–306.1 OF THIS
TITLE.
(4) “QUALITY RATING” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9.5–306.1 OF
THIS TITLE.
(B) IF THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES THAT A CHILD CARE CENTER WITH
A PUBLISHED MARYLAND EXCELS QUALITY RATING HAS VIOLATED A
REQUIREMENT OF THIS TITLE OR A RULE OR REGULATION ADOPTED UNDER THIS
TITLE, THE DEPARTMENT IMMEDIATELY SHALL NOTIFY THE OPERATOR OF THE
CHILD CARE CENTER OF THE VIOLATION.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT AND THE OPERATOR OF THE CHILD CARE CENTER
SHALL ENTER INTO AN AGREEMENT THAT DESCRIBES:
(1) THE NATURE OF THE VIOLATION;
(2) THE ACTIONS TO BE TAKEN BY THE CHILD CARE CENTER TO
BECOME COMPLIANT; AND
(3) A PLAN FOR FOLLOW–UP BY THE DEPARTMENT TO ENSURE THAT
THE CHILD CARE CENTER HAS RETURNED TO AND REMAINS FULLY COMPLIANT WITH
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS TITLE OR A RULE OR REGULATION THAT WAS PREVIOUSLY
VIOLATED.
(D) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
THE DEPARTMENT MAY REDUCE OR RESCIND A PUBLISHED MARYLAND EXCELS
QUALITY RATING IF THE CHILD CARE CENTER:
(I) FAILS TO COMPLY WITH THE TERMS OF THE AGREEMENT OR
OTHERWISE FAILS TO CURE THE INITIAL VIOLATION; OR
(II) FAILS OR REFUSES TO ENTER INTO AN AGREEMENT.
(2) IF THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES THAT THE VIOLATION DID NOT
INVOLVE AN IMMEDIATE RISK TO CHILD SAFETY AND THE CHILD CARE CENTER
TIMELY RETURNED TO COMPLIANCE, THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT REDUCE THE
PUBLISHED MARYLAND EXCELS QUALITY RATING OF THE CHILD CARE CENTER.

HOUSE BILL 1574
(E) IF THE DEPARTMENT REDUCES THE PUBLISHED MARYLAND EXCELS
QUALITY RATING OF A CHILD CARE CENTER, WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE CENTER
RETURNS TO COMPLIANCE BY FULFILLING THE TERMS OF THE AGREEMENT
REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
RESTORE THE PUBLISHED MARYLAND EXCELS QUALITY RATING OF THE CHILD
CARE CENTER TO THE QUALITY RATING EARNED BEFORE THE VIOLATION
OCCURRED.
(F) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION MAY BE CONSTRUED TO LIMIT THE ABILITY
OF THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT TO SUSPEND A LICENSE OR LETTER OF
COMPLIANCE ON AN EMERGENCY BASIS TO PROTECT THE HEALTH, SAFETY, OR
WELFARE OF CHILDREN IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 9.5–411 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
9.5–411.2.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “FAILURE TO SUPERVISE” MEANS THE FAILURE OF AN
INDIVIDUAL RESPONSIBLE FOR OVERSEEING THE WELL–BEING OF CHILDREN TO
MONITOR PROPERLY OR PROTECT THE CHILDREN IN THE INDIVIDUAL’S CARE.
(B) IF THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT DETERMINES THAT AN INDIVIDUAL
MAY NOT BE EMPLOYED BY A CHILD CARE OPERATOR DUE TO A FINDING OF A
FAILURE TO SUPERVISE, THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT SHALL PROVIDE WRITTEN
NOTICE TO THE INDIVIDUAL AND THE CHILD CARE CENTER OPERATOR THAT
INCLUDES:
(1) A STATEMENT OF THE FINDING; AND
(2) THE REASONS FOR THE FINDING.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL MAINTAIN A LIST OF INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE
PROHIBITED FROM EMPLOYMENT IN A CHILD CARE CENTER DUE TO A FAILURE TO
SUPERVISE UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
(D) (1) AN INDIVIDUAL PROHIBITED FROM EMPLOYMENT ON THE LIST
UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION MAY REQUEST A CONDUCT
REASSESSMENT AND REMOVAL FROM THE LIST IF THE INDIVIDUAL:
(I) SUBMITS A WRITTEN REQUEST TO THE DEPARTMENT,
INCLUDING ANY DOCUMENTATION REQUIRED BY THE DEPARTMENT;
(II) COMPLETES ACTIVE SUPERVISION TRAINING APPROVED BY
THE DEPARTMENT; AND

HOUSE BILL 1574 19
(III) COMPLETES ANY OTHER CORRECTIVE ACTIONS REQUIRED
BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(2) IF AN INDIVIDUAL UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION
COMPLETES THE REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT TO THE
SATISFACTION OF THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT, THE INDIVIDUAL SHALL BE
REMOVED FROM THE LIST UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION AND ELIGIBLE
FOR EMPLOYMENT AT A CHILD CARE CENTER.
(E) IF THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT DETERMINES THAT A VIOLATION OF
THIS TITLE OR A RULE OR REGULATION ADOPTED UNDER THIS TITLE FOR A FAILURE
TO SUPERVISE WAS DUE ONLY TO THE CONDUCT OF AN INDIVIDUAL PROHIBITED
FROM EMPLOYMENT UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE STATE
SUPERINTENDENT MAY NOT SANCTION THE CHILD CARE CENTER FOR THE
VIOLATION.
(F) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION MAY BE CONSTRUED TO LIMIT THE ABILITY
OF THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT TO SUSPEND A LICENSE OR LETTER OF
COMPLIANCE ON AN EMERGENCY BASIS TO PROTECT THE HEALTH, SAFETY, OR
WELFARE OF CHILDREN IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 9.5–411 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) There is a Workgroup to Study Illegally Provided Child Care.
(b) The Workgroup consists of the following members:
(1) two members of the Senate of Maryland, appointed by the President of
the Senate;
(2) two members of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker of
the House;
(3) the State Superintendent of Schools, or the Superintendent’s designee;
(4) the Secretary of Human Services, or the Secretary’s designee;
(5) one representative of the Maryland Family Network, designated by the
Executive Director of the Maryland Family Network;
(6) one representative of the Maryland State Child Care Association,
designated by the President of the Maryland State Child Care Association;

HOUSE BILL 1574
(7) one representative of the Maryland State Family Child Care
Association, designated by the President of the Maryland State Family Child Care
Association;
(8) one representative of the Maryland Head Start Association, designated
by the President of the Maryland Head Start Association;
(9) one representative of the Latino Child Care Association of Maryland,
Inc., designated by the President of the Latino Child Care Association of Maryland, Inc.;
and
(10) the following members appointed by the Governor:
(i) two parents of children enrolled in the Child Care Scholarship
Program;
(ii) two representatives from child care providers that:
1. serve children under the age of 5 years; and
2. accept scholarships from the Child Care Scholarship
Program;
(iii) one representative of a labor union that represents child care
workers;
(iv) two representatives of law enforcement; and
(v) two nonvoting representatives of national child care policy
organizations with expertise in state child care financing models.
(c) The State Superintendent of Schools shall designate the chair of the
Workgroup.
(d) The State Department of Education shall provide staff for the Workgroup.
(e) A member of the Workgroup:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Workgroup; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) The Workgroup shall study and make recommendations about the scale and
impacts of illegally provided child care in the State, including:

HOUSE BILL 1574 21
(1) the number, geographic location, socioeconomic status, race, ethnicity,
and disability status of children who lack access to safe, regulated child care;
(2) the impact of illegally provided care on family child care homes, large
family child care homes, child care centers, and the child care industry as a whole;
(3) barriers to registration or licensure for child care providers and the best
practices to remove identified barriers, including greater assistance to providers, improved
communication between regulators and providers, or regulatory or statutory changes;
(4) the distinct, documented risks to the health and safety of children of
illegally provided child care and potential health and safety risks that illegally provided
child care could pose to children; and
(5) any legal changes necessary to prevent illegally provided child care,
including any statutory or regulatory changes necessary to ease the investigation and
enforcement of existing State law.
(g) (1) On or before January 1, 2027, the Workgroup shall submit an interim
report on its findings and recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with §
2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly.
(2) On or before December 1, 2028, the Workgroup shall submit a final
report on its findings and recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with §
2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The State Department of Education and the Office of the Child Care Advocacy
Council jointly shall review:
(1) the impact of the rating reductions for Maryland EXCELS; and
(2) experiential education requirements for child care providers.
(b) In conducting the review, the report from the Office of Program Evaluation
and Government Accountability of the Department of Legislative Services titled
“Evaluation of the Division of Early Childhood” shall be considered.
(c) On or before December 1, 2027, the Department shall report to the General
Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, on:
(1) findings from the review; and
(2) recommendations for statutory or regulatory changes to address
workforce and licensing challenges.

HOUSE BILL 1574
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026. Section 2 of this Act shall remain effective for a period of 3 2 years and, at the end
of June 30, 2029 2028, Section 2 of this Act, with no further action required by the General
Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.